Hawaii, session 2026, HB979.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 666, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§666-     Summary possession proceedings; tax clearance.  (a)  The person or entity seeking possession of the premises for failure to pay rent shall include in the complaint filed with the court the current general excise tax license number used for rental income earned from the premises; provided that if the complaint does not include the information required by this subsection, then the complaint shall be dismissed. (b)  The judiciary shall submit an annual list of all summary possession cases filed with the courts to the department of taxation.  The list shall include the following information: (1)  The case number; (2)  The name of the person or entity seeking possession of the property; (3)  The general excise tax license number provided, if any; and (4)  The date the complaint was filed." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________